Utah statutes.
26-6b-6.   Court determination for an order of restriction after examination
period.
(1)  The district court shall set a hearing regarding the involuntary order of
restriction of an individual or group of individuals, to be held within ten
business days of the issuance of its order of restriction issued pursuant to
Section 26-6b-5, unless the petitioner informs the district court prior to
this hearing that the individual or group of individuals:
(a)  are not subject to restriction; or
(b)  have stipulated to the issuance of an order of restriction.
(2)  If the individual or an individual in a group of individuals has
stipulated to the issuance of an order of restriction, the court may issue an
order as provided in Subsection (6) for those individuals without further
hearing.
(3) (a)  If the examination report required in Section 26-6b-5 proves the
individual or group of individuals are not subject to restriction, the court
may without further hearing terminate the proceedings and dismiss the
petition.
(b)  The court may, after a hearing at which the individual or group of
individuals are present in person or by telephonic or other electronic means
and have had the opportunity to be represented by counsel, extend its order of
restriction for a reasonable period, not to exceed 90 days, if the court has
reason to believe the individual or group of individuals are infected by or
contaminated with:
(i)  a communicable or possibly communicable disease that poses a threat to
public health;
(ii)  an infectious agent or possibly infectious agent that poses a threat to
public health;
(iii)  a chemical or biological agent that poses a threat to public health; or
(iv)  a condition that poses a threat to public health, but, despite the
exercise of reasonable diligence the diagnostic studies have not been
completed.
(4)  The petitioner shall, at the time of the hearing, provide the district
court with the following items, to the extent that they have been issued or
are otherwise available:
(a)  the order of restriction issued by the petitioner;
(b)  admission notes if any individual was hospitalized; and
(c)  medical records pertaining to the current order of restriction.
(5)  The information provided to the court under Subsection (4) shall also be
provided to the individual's or group of individual's counsel at the time of
the hearing, and at any time prior to the hearing upon request of counsel.
(6) (a)  The district court shall order the individual and each individual in
a group of individuals to submit to the order of restriction if, upon
completion of the hearing and consideration of the record, it finds by clear
and convincing evidence that:
(i)  the individual or group of individuals are infected with a communicable
disease or infectious agent, are contaminated with a chemical or biological
agent, or are in a condition that poses a threat to public health;
(ii)  there is no appropriate and less restrictive alternative to a court
order of examination, quarantine, isolation, and treatment, or any of them;
(iii)  the petitioner can provide the individual or group of individuals with
treatment that is adequate and appropriate to the individual's or group of
individuals' conditions and needs; and
(iv)  it is in the public interest to order the individual or group of
individuals to submit to involuntary examination, quarantine, isolation, and
treatment, or any of them after weighing the following factors:
(A)  the personal or religious beliefs, if any, of the individual that are
opposed to medical examination or treatment;
(B)  the ability of the department to control the public health threat with
treatment alternatives that are requested by the individual;
(C)  the economic impact for the department if the individual is permitted to
use an alternative to the treatment recommended by the department; and
(D)  other relevant factors as determined by the court.
(b)  If upon completion of the hearing the court does not find all of the
conditions listed in Subsection (6)(a) exist, the court shall immediately
dismiss the petition.
(7)  The order of restriction shall designate the period, subject to
Subsection (8), for which the individual or group of individuals shall be
examined, treated, isolated, or quarantined.
(8) (a)  The order of restriction may not exceed six months without benefit of
a district court review hearing.
(b)  The district court review hearing shall be held prior to the expiration
of the order of restriction issued under Subsection (7).  At the review
hearing the court may issue an order of restriction for up to an indeterminate
period, if the district court enters a written finding in the record
determining by clear and convincing evidence that the required conditions in
Subsection (6) will continue for an indeterminate period.
